Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1939XC (3) 91 lh/ko S.F. _____ Section 1. ANTI-OBESITY MEDICATION REVIEW AND REPORT. For 1 purposes of the medical assistance program under chapter 2 249A and health insurance plans established pursuant to 3 chapter 509A for public employees, the department of health 4 and human services and the department of administrative 5 services shall review anti-obesity medications, including 6 GLP-1 agonists, for effectiveness relating to weight loss, 7 the impact on comorbidities, the potential for cost savings 8 due to deferred medical procedures and reduced medications 9 related to comorbidity, recommended eligibility requirements, 10 and any other criteria the departments deem relevant. The 11 department of health and human services and the department of 12 administrative services shall submit a report to the general 13 assembly by January 5, 2026, with the departmentsâ findings and 14 proposed eligibility requirements. 15